Utah statutes.
58-70a-302.   Qualifications for licensure.

Each applicant for licensure as a physician assistant shall:

(1)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(2)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(3)  be of good moral character;

(4)  have successfully completed a physician assistant program accredited by the:

(a)  Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant; or

(b)  if prior to January 1, 2001, either the:

(i)  Committee on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs; or

(ii)  Committee on Allied Health Education and Accreditation;

(5)  have passed the licensing examinations required by division rule made in collaboration with the board;

(6)  meet with the board and representatives of the division, if requested, for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for licensure; and

(7) (a)  if the applicant desires to practice in Utah, complete a form provided by the division indicating:

(i)  the applicant has completed a delegation of services agreement signed by the physician assistant, supervising physician, and substitute supervising physicians; and

(ii)  the agreement is on file at the Utah practice sites; or

(b)  complete a form provided by the division indicating the applicant is not practicing in Utah and, prior to practicing in Utah, the applicant will meet the requirements of Subsection (7)(a).



Amended by Chapter 37, 2010 General Session

